Washington statutes.
RCW 24.60.030

Emergency responders—Qualifications.

An emergency responder holding a license, certificate, or other permit issued by a responding member jurisdiction evidencing qualification in a professional, mechanical, or other skill shall be deemed to be licensed, certified, or permitted in the requesting member jurisdiction, subject to any limitations and conditions the chief executive of the requesting member jurisdiction may prescribe.

[ 2011 c 215 s 3.]